Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.220

Attorney may be employed.

The board of directors of every second-class district in addition to their other powers are authorized to employ an attorney and to prescribe the attorney's duties and fix the attorney's compensation.

[ 1990 c 33 s 351; 1975 c 43 s 19; 1971 c 8 s 5. Prior: 1967 c 220 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.60.310, 28.63.340.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.

Severability—1971 c 8: See note following RCW 28A.320.310.